District of Columbia statutes.
26-1117

Evasive business tactics.

(a)

If the Commissioner finds that the conduct of any other business conceals a violation or evasion of this chapter, any rule or regulation adopted under this chapter, or any law regulating mortgage loan lending in the District, the Commissioner may issue a written order to a licensee or person required to be licensed under this chapter to:

(1)

Stop doing business at any place in which the other business is conducted or solicited; or

(2)

Stop doing business in association or conjunction with the other business.

(b)

A licensee or person required to be licensed under this chapter who violates an order of the Commissioner issued under this section shall be subject to the penalties provided by § 26-1118.

(c)

The Commissioner may request the Attorney General of the District of Columbia to take appropriate action for the enforcement of an order issued under this section.

Sept. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-155, § 18, 43 DCR 4213
July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-38, § 2(k), 56 DCR 4290
This section is referenced in § 26-1119.
1981 Ed., § 26-1017.
D.C. Law 18-38 substituted “Commissioner” for “Superintendent”; in subsecs. (a) and (b), substituted “licensee or person required to be licensed under this chapter” for “licensee”; and, in subsec. (c), substituted “Attorney General” for “Corporation Counsel”.